West Virginia, session 2026, SB136.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. CANCELLATION, SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF LICENSES. §17B-3-14. Reports on mental or physical disabilities or disorders to Division. (a) Short title. – The provisions of this section shall be known as "McKayla, Miranda, and Philip's Law".(b) In addition to the provisions of §17B-3-13 otherwise set forth in this article, the following shall be considered by the Division of Motor Vehicles in determining the competency of an individual to retain their driver's license:(1) Definition of disorders and disabilities. – The Division of Motor Vehicles shall consider disorders characterized by lapses of consciousness or other mental or physical disabilities affecting the ability of a person to drive safely for the purpose of the reports required by this section, as provided by health care providers licensed and authorized pursuant to chapter thirty of the code.(2) Reports by health care personnel to DMV. – All physicians, podiatrists, chiropractors, physician assistants, certified registered nurse practitioners, and other persons authorized to diagnose or treat disorders and disabilities, licensed and authorized pursuant to chapter thirty of the code, shall report to the Division of Motor Vehicles, in writing, the full name, date of birth, and address of every person over 15 years of age diagnosed as having any specified disorder or disability within 10 days.(3) Responsibility of institution heads. – The person in charge of every mental hospital, institution or clinic, or any alcohol or drug treatment facility, shall be responsible to assure that reports are filed in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.(4) Confidentiality of reports. – The reports required by this section shall be confidential and shall be used solely for the purpose of determining the qualifications of any person to drive a motor vehicle on the highways of this state.(5) Use of report as evidence. – No report forwarded under the provisions of this section shall be used as evidence in any civil or criminal trial except in any proceeding under a determination of incompetency.(6) Immunity from civil and criminal liability. – No civil or criminal action may be brought against any person or agency for providing the information required under this system.(c) The provisions of this section shall become effective July 1, 2026.